Utah statutes.
32B-9-203.   Bond for event permit.

(1) (a)  A person applying for an event permit shall post a cash bond or surety bond:

(i)  in the amount specified in the relevant part under this chapter for the type of event permit for which the person is applying; and

(ii)  payable to the department.

(b)  An event permittee shall procure and maintain a bond required under this section for as long as the event permit is in effect.

(2)  A bond posted by an event permittee under this section shall be:

(a)  in a form approved by the attorney general; and

(b)  conditioned upon the event permittee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the commission.

(3)  No part of a bond posted by an event permittee under this section may be withdrawn during the period the event permit is in effect.

(4) (a)  A bond posted by an event permittee under this section may be forfeited if the event permit is revoked.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), the department may make a claim against a bond posted by an event permittee for money owed the department under this title without the commission first revoking the event permit.

